Utah statutes.
48-2e-111.   Registered agent.

(1)  Each limited partnership and each registered foreign limited partnership shall designate in accordance with Section 16-17-203(1) and maintain a registered agent in this state.

(2)  A limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership may change its registered agent or the address of its registered agent by filing with the division a statement of change in accordance with Section 16-17-206.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

